Utah statutes.
78A-7-207.   Compensation -- Annual review and adjustment.

(1)  The governing body of each municipality or county shall annually review and may adjust the compensation paid.

(2)  The salary fixed for a justice court judge may not be diminished during the term for which the judge has been appointed or elected.

(3)  A copy of the resolution, ordinance, or other document fixing the salary of the justice court judge and any adjustments to the document shall be furnished to the state court administrator by the governing body of the municipality or county.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

